Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.225

Exemption from fees of schools of medicine or dentistry at University of Washington—Exemption from nonresident tuition fees differential for participants in the Washington, Alaska, Montana, Idaho, or Wyoming program at Washington State University.

Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing board of the University of Washington may exempt the following students from the payment of all or a portion of the nonresident tuition fees differential: Students admitted to the university's school of medicine pursuant to contracts with the states of Alaska, Montana, Idaho, or Wyoming, or agencies thereof, providing for a program of regionalized medical education conducted by the school of medicine; or students admitted to the university's school of dentistry pursuant to contracts with the states of Utah, Idaho, or any other western state which does not have a school of dentistry, or agencies thereof, providing for a program of regionalized dental education conducted by the school of dentistry. The proportional cost of the program, in excess of resident student tuition and fees, will be reimbursed to the university by or on behalf of participating states or agencies. Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing board of Washington State University may exempt from payment all or a portion of the nonresident tuition fees differential for any student admitted to the University of Washington's school of medicine and attending Washington State University as a participant in the Washington, Alaska, Montana, Idaho, or Wyoming program in this section. Washington State University may reduce the professional student tuition for students enrolled in this program by the amount the student pays the University of Washington as a registration fee.

[ 1997 c 50 s 1; 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 9; 1992 c 231 s 8; 1981 c 20 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 105 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28B.12.060.

Effective date—1992 c 231: See note following RCW 28B.10.016.